Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1716
Parking authority; alienating or encumbering property; pledging credit; levy of tax; prohibited; when.

Nothing in sections 14-1701 to 14-1725 shall be construed (1) as granting to the authority any power to alienate or encumber any real property belonging to the state or any of its political subdivisions, (2) to grant to the authority any right or power to pledge the credit of the State of Nebraska, or any of its subdivisions, or (3) to give the authority any power to levy or assess taxes.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 16, p. 111.